Utah statutes.
26-21-14.   Closing facility -- Appeal.

(1)  If the department finds a condition in any licensed health care facility that is a clear hazard to the public health, the department may immediately order that facility closed and may prevent the entrance of any resident or patient onto the premises of that facility until the condition is eliminated.

(2)  Parties aggrieved by the actions of the department under this section may obtain an adjudicative proceeding and judicial review.



Amended by Chapter 114, 1990 General Session

